Utah statutes.
13-1a-8.   Violation of restraining or injunctive order -- Civil penalty.

If any restraining order or injunction issued under this chapter is violated, the division may submit a motion for, or the court on its own motion may impose, a civil penalty of not more than $100 for each day a restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction issued under this chapter is violated, if the party has received notice of the restraining order or injunction. 

